District of Columbia statutes.
6-1062.05

Authority of the Deputy Mayor for Economic Development.

The Deputy Mayor for Economic Development shall have the authority and responsibility of ensuring that the District’s interests and goals, to the fullest extent possible, are achieved as set forth in this part. When the project is approved for construction, the Deputy Mayor and the Developer will develop a timetable for the development of the project and will provide detailed quarterly reports to the Mayor and the Council.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-278, § 205, 54 DCR 895